Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Chapter 2 Department of Agriculture

Cross references. —

As to duty of department to establish plan for rodent and predator control, see §

11-6-104

.

As to authority of department to conduct state fair, see §

11-10-101

.

As to licensing seed dealers, see §

11-12-103

.

As to administering Fertilizer Law, see §

11-14-102

.

As to the Wyoming state loan and investment board, see chapter 34 of this title.

As to the Wyoming beef council, see chapter 37 of this title.

As to the Wyoming wheat commission, see chapter 38 of this title.

As to license requirement for a food wholesaler or retailer, see §

35-7-124

.

As to transfer of office of state chemist to state department of agriculture, see §

35-7-201

.

As to license requirement for a food wholesaler or retailer, see §

35-7-124

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 1 et seq.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 15 to 24.